California statutes. Corporations Code
(e) Any applicant may, upon payment of the fee prescribed therefor in the Government Code, obtain from the Secretary of State a certificate of reservation of any name not prohibited by subdivision (c), and upon the issuance of the certificate the name stated therein shall be reserved for a period of 60 days. The Secretary of State shall not, however, issue certificates reserving the same name for two or more consecutive 60-day periods to the same applicant or for the use or benefit of the same person; nor shall consecutive reservations be made by or for the use or
 benefit of the same person of names so similar as to fall within the prohibitions of subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 56.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7122.3.

The Secretary of State shall not file articles for a corporation the name of which would fall within the prohibitions of Section 18104 of the Financial Code. This section shall not apply to articles filed for a corporation organized in accordance with Section 18100 of the Financial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 453, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Articles of Incorporation [7130. - 7135.]

7130.

The articles of incorporation of a corporation formed under this part shall set forth the following:

(a) The name of the corporation.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) or (3), the following statement:
“This corporation is a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation organized under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law. The purpose of this corporation is to engage in any lawful act or activity, other than credit union business, for which a corporation may be organized under such law.”

(2) In the case of a corporation formed under this part that is subject to the California Credit Union Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section
 14000) of Division 5 of the Financial Code), the articles shall set forth a statement of purpose that is prescribed in the applicable provisions of the California Credit Union Law.

(3) In the case of a corporation formed under this part that is a public bank, as defined in Section 57600 of the Government Code, the articles shall set forth a statement of purpose that is prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 57601 of the Government Code.

(4) The articles may include a further definition of the corporation’s purposes.

(c) The name and street address in this state of the corporation’s initial agent for service of process in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8210.

(d) The initial street address of the corporation.

(e) The initial mailing address of the corporation, if different from the initial street address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 442, Sec. 3.   (AB 857)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7131.

The articles of incorporation may set forth a further statement limiting the purposes or powers of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7132.

(a) The articles of incorporation may set forth any or all of the following provisions, which shall not be effective unless expressly provided in the articles:

(1) A provision limiting the duration of the corporation’s existence to a specified date.

(2) A provision conferring upon the holders of any evidences of indebtedness, issued or to be issued by a corporation the right to vote in the election of directors and on any other matters on which members may vote under this part even if the corporation does not have members.

(3) A provision conferring upon members the right to determine the
 consideration for which memberships shall be issued.

(4) In the case of a subordinate corporation instituted or created under the authority of a head organization, a provision setting forth either or both of the following:

(A) That the subordinate corporation shall dissolve whenever its charter is surrendered to, taken away by, or revoked by the head organization granting it.

(B) That in the event of its dissolution pursuant to an article provision allowed by subparagraph (A) or in the event of its dissolution for any reason, any assets of the corporation after compliance with the applicable provisions of Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 8510), 16 (commencing with Section 8610), and 17 (commencing with Section 8710) shall be distributed to the head organization.

(b) Nothing contained in subdivision (a) shall affect the enforceability, as between the parties thereto, of any lawful agreement not otherwise contrary to public policy.

(c) The articles of incorporation
 may set forth any or all of the following provisions:

(1) The names and addresses of the persons appointed to act as initial directors.

(2) Provisions concerning the transfer of memberships, in accordance with Section 7320.

(3) The classes of members, if any, and if there are two or more classes, the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions and conditions attaching to each class.

(4) A provision which would allow any member to have more or less than one vote in any election or other matter presented to the members for a vote.

(5) A provision that requires an amendment to the articles, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 7812, or to the bylaws, and any amendment or repeal of that
 amendment, to be approved in writing by a specified person or persons other than the board or the members. However, this approval requirement, unless the articles specify otherwise, shall not apply if any of the following circumstances exist:

(A) The specified person or persons have died or ceased to exist.

(B) If the right of the specified person or persons to approve is in the capacity of an officer, trustee, or other status and the office, trust, or status has ceased to exist.

(C) If the corporation has a specific proposal for amendment or repeal, and the corporation has provided written notice of that proposal, including a copy of the proposal, to the specified person or persons at the most recent address for each of them, based on the corporation’s records, and the corporation has not received written approval
 or nonapproval within the period specified in the notice, which shall not be less than 10 nor more than 30 days commencing at least 20 days after the notice has been provided.

(6) Any other provision, not in conflict with law, for the management of the activities and for the conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including any provision which is required or permitted by this part to be stated in the bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 16.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7133.

For all purposes other than an action in the nature of quo warranto, a copy of the articles of a corporation duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the formation of the corporation and prima facie evidence of its corporate existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7134.

If initial directors have not been named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators, until the directors are elected, may do whatever is necessary and proper to perfect the organization of the corporation, including the adoption and amendment of bylaws of the corporation and the election of directors and officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7135.

Nothing in Section 7130 or 7131 or in any provision of the articles of a mutual benefit corporation shall be construed to limit the equitable power of a court to impress a charitable trust upon any or all of the assets of a mutual benefit corporation or otherwise treat it as a public benefit corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers [7140. - 7142.]

7140.

Subject to any limitations contained in the articles or bylaws and to compliance with other provisions of this division and any other applicable laws, a corporation, in carrying out its activities, shall have all of the powers of a natural person, including, without limitation, the power to:

(a) Adopt, use, and at will alter a corporate seal, but failure to affix a seal does not affect the validity of any instrument.

(b) Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws.

(c) Qualify to conduct its activities in any other state, territory, dependency, or foreign country.

(d) Issue, purchase, redeem, receive, take or
 otherwise acquire, own, sell, lend, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, pledge, use, and otherwise deal in and with its own memberships, bonds, debentures, notes, and debt securities.

(e) Pay pensions, and establish and carry out pension, deferred compensation, saving, thrift, and other retirement, incentive, and benefit plans, trusts, and provisions for any or all of its directors, officers, employees, and persons providing services to it or any of its subsidiary or related or associated corporations, and to indemnify and purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any fiduciary of such plans, trusts, or provisions.

(f) Issue certificates evidencing membership in accordance with the provisions of Section 7313 and issue identity cards.

(g) Levy dues, assessments, and admission and transfer fees.

(h) Make donations for the public welfare or for community funds, hospital, charitable, educational, scientific, civic, religious, or similar purposes.

(i) Assume obligations, enter into contracts, including contracts of guarantee or suretyship, incur liabilities, borrow or lend money or otherwise use its credit, and secure any of its obligations, contracts, or liabilities by mortgage, pledge, or other encumbrance of all or any part of its property and income.

(j) Participate with others in any partnership, joint venture, or other association, transaction, or arrangement of any kind whether or not such participation involves sharing or delegation of control with or to others.

(k) Act as trustee under any trust incidental to the principal objects of the
 corporation, and receive, hold, administer, exchange, and expend funds and property subject to such trust.

(l) Carry on a business at a profit and apply any profit that results from the business activity to any activity in which it may lawfully engage.

(m) (1) In anticipation of or during an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 7151:

(A) Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent resulting from the emergency.

(B) Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional
 offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

(2) During an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 7151:

(A) Give notice to a director or directors in any practicable manner under the circumstances, including, but not limited to, by publication and radio, when notice of a meeting of the board cannot be given to that director or directors in the manner prescribed by the bylaws or Section 7211.

(B) Deem that one or more officers of the corporation present at a board meeting is a director, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum for that meeting.

(3) In anticipation of or during an emergency, the board may take any action that it determines to be necessary or appropriate to respond to the emergency, mitigate the effects of the emergency, or comply with lawful federal and state government orders, but shall not take any action that requires the vote of the members, unless the required vote of the members was obtained prior to the emergency.

(4) Any actions taken in good faith in anticipation of or during an emergency under this subdivision bind the corporation and shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “emergency” means any of the following events or circumstances as a result of which, and only so long as, a quorum of the corporation’s board of directors cannot be readily convened for action:

(A) A natural catastrophe, including, but not limited to, a hurricane, tornado, storm, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, drought, epidemic, pandemic, or disease outbreak, or, regardless of cause, any fire, flood, or explosion.

(B) An attack on or within this state or on the public security of its residents by an enemy of this state or on the nation by an enemy of the United States of America, or upon receipt by this state of a warning from the federal government indicating that any such enemy attack is probable or imminent.

(C) An act of terrorism or other manmade disaster that results in extraordinary levels of casualties or damage or disruption severely affecting the infrastructure, environment, economy, government functions, or
 population, including, but not limited to, mass evacuations.

(D) A state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor of this state, including any person serving as Governor in accordance with Section 10 of Article V of the California Constitution and Section 12058 of the Government Code, or by the President of the United States of America.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 10.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7141.

Subject to Section 7142:

(a) No limitation upon the activities, purposes, or powers of the corporation or upon the powers of the members, officers, or directors, or the manner of exercise of such powers, contained in or implied by the articles or by Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 8510), 16 (commencing with Section 8610), and 17 (commencing with Section 8710) shall be asserted as between the corporation or member, officer or director and any third person, except in a proceeding: (1) by a member or the state to enjoin the doing or continuation of unauthorized activities by the corporation or its officers, or both, in cases where third parties have not acquired rights thereby, (2) to dissolve the corporation, or (3) by the corporation or by a member suing in a representative suit against the officers or directors of the corporation for violation of their authority.

(b) Any contract or conveyance made in the name of a corporation which is authorized or ratified by the board, or is done within the scope of authority, actual or apparent, conferred by the board or within the agency power of the officer executing it, except as the board’s authority is limited by law other than this part, binds the corporation, and the corporation acquires rights thereunder whether the contract is executed or wholly or in part executory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

7142.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 7141, in the case of a corporation holding assets in charitable trust, any of the following may bring an action to enjoin, correct, obtain damages for or to otherwise remedy a breach of the charitable trust:
 (1) The corporation, or a member in the name of the corporation pursuant to Section 7710.(2) An officer of the corporation.(3) A director of the corporation.(4) A person with a reversionary, contractual, or property interest in the assets subject to such charitable trust.(5) The Attorney General, or any person granted relator status by the Attorney General.The Attorney General shall be given notice of any action brought by the persons specified in paragraphs (1) through (4), and may intervene.

(b) In an action under this section, the court may not rescind or enjoin the performance of a contract unless:

(1) All of the parties to the contract are parties to the action; or

(2) No party to the contract has, in good faith, and without actual notice of the trust restriction, parted with value, under the contract or in reliance upon it; and

(3) It is equitable to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bylaws [7150. - 7153.]

7150.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) and Sections 7151, 7220, 7224, 7512, 7613, and 7615, bylaws may be adopted, amended or repealed by the board unless the action would:

(1) Materially and adversely affect the rights of members as to voting, dissolution, redemption, or transfer;

(2) Increase or decrease the number of members authorized in total or for any class;

(3) Effect an exchange, reclassification or cancellation of all or part of the memberships; or

(4) Authorize a new class of membership.

(b) Bylaws may be adopted, amended or repealed by approval of the members (Section 5034); provided, however, that such adoption, amendment or repeal also requires approval by the members of a class if such action would:

(1) Materially and adversely affect the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption, or transfer in a manner different than such action affects another class;

(2) Materially and adversely affect such class as to voting, dissolution, redemption, or transfer by changing the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of another class;

(3) Increase or decrease the number of memberships authorized for such class;

(4) Increase the number of memberships authorized for another class;

(5) Effect an exchange, reclassification or cancellation of all or part of the memberships of such class; or

(6) Authorize a new class of memberships.

(c) The articles or bylaws may restrict or eliminate the power of the board to adopt, amend or repeal any or all bylaws, subject to subdivision (e) of Section 7151.

(d) Bylaws may also provide that the repeal or amendment of those bylaws, or the repeal or amendment of specified portions of those bylaws, may occur only with the approval in writing of a specified person or persons other than the board or members. However, this approval requirement, unless the bylaws specify
 otherwise, shall not apply if any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The specified person or persons have died or ceased to exist.

(2) If the right of the specified person or persons to approve is in the capacity of an officer, trustee, or other status and the office, trust, or status has ceased to exist.

(3) If the corporation has a specific proposal for amendment or repeal, and the corporation has provided written notice of that proposal, including a copy of the proposal, to the specified person or persons at the most recent address for each of them, based on the corporation’s records, and the corporation has not received written approval or nonapproval within the period specified in the notice, which shall not be less than 10 nor more than 30 days commencing at least 20 days after the notice has been
 provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 17.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

7151.

(a) The bylaws shall set forth (unless such provision is contained in the articles, in which case it may only be changed by an amendment of the articles) the number of directors of the corporation, or the method of determining the number of directors of the corporation, or that the number of directors shall be not less than a stated minimum nor more than a stated maximum with the exact number of directors to be fixed, within the limits specified, by approval of the board or the members (Section 5034), in the manner provided in the bylaws, subject to subdivision (e). The number or minimum number of directors may be one or more.

(b) Once members have been admitted, a bylaw specifying or changing a fixed number of directors or the maximum or minimum number or changing
 from a fixed to a variable board or vice versa may only be adopted by approval of the members (Section 5034).

(c) The bylaws may contain any provision, not in conflict with law or the articles, for the management of the activities and for the conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including but not limited to:

(1) Any provision referred to in subdivision (c) of Section 7132.

(2) The time, place, and manner of calling, conducting, and giving notice of members’, directors’, and committee meetings, or of conducting mail ballots.

(3) The qualifications, duties, and compensation of directors; the time of their election; and the requirements of a quorum for directors’ and committee meetings.

(4) The appointment of committees, composed of directors or nondirectors, or both, by the board or any officer and the authority of any such committees.

(5) The appointment, duties, compensation, and tenure of officers.

(6) The mode of determination of members of record.

(7) The making of reports and financial statements to members.

(8) Setting, imposing, and collecting dues, assessments, and admission and transfer fees.

(d) The bylaws may provide for the manner of admission, withdrawal, suspension, and expulsion of members, consistent with the requirements of Section 7341.

(e) The bylaws may require, for any or
 all corporate actions (except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7222, subdivision (c) of Section 7615, and Section 8610) the vote of a larger proportion of, or all of, the members or the members of any class, unit, or grouping of members or the vote of a larger proportion of, or all of, the directors, than is otherwise required by this part. Such a provision in the bylaws requiring such greater vote shall not be altered, amended, or repealed except by such greater vote, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws.

(f) The bylaws may contain a provision limiting the number of members, in total or of any class, which the corporation is authorized to admit.

(g) (1) The bylaws may contain any provision, not in conflict with the articles, to manage and conduct the business affairs of the corporation effective only in an emergency as
 defined in Section 7140, including, but not limited to, procedures for calling a board meeting, quorum requirements for a board meeting, and designation of additional or substitute directors.

(2) During an emergency, the board may take any action that it determines to be necessary or appropriate to respond to the emergency, mitigate the effects of the emergency, or comply with lawful federal and state government orders, but shall not take any action that requires the vote of the members, unless the required vote of the members was obtained prior to the emergency.

(3) All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws shall remain effective during the emergency, and the emergency bylaws shall not be effective after the emergency ends.

(4) Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with
 the emergency bylaws binds the corporation, and shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 11.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7152.

A corporation may provide in its bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members. Where delegates are provided for, the bylaws shall set forth delegates’ terms of office, any reasonable method for delegates’ selection and removal, and any reasonable method for calling, noticing, and holding meetings of delegates, may set forth the manner in which delegates may act by written ballot similar to Section 7513 for written ballot of members, and may set forth the manner in which delegates may participate in meetings of delegates similar to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 7211. Each delegate shall have one vote on each matter presented for action. A delegate shall not vote by proxy. Delegates may be given a name other than “delegates.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 12.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.

A corporation may provide in its bylaws for voting by its members or delegates on the basis of chapter or other organizational unit, or by region or other geographic grouping.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Location and Inspection of Articles and Bylaws [7160. - 7160.]

7160.

Every corporation shall keep at its principal office in this state the original or a copy of its articles and bylaws as amended to date, which shall be open to inspection by the members at all reasonable times during office hours. If the corporation has no office in this state, it shall upon the written request of any member furnish to such member a copy of the articles or bylaws as amended to date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Directors and Management [7210. - 7240.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [7210. - 7215.]

7210.

Each corporation shall have a board of directors. Subject to the provisions of this part and any limitations in the articles or bylaws relating to action required to be approved by the members (Section 5034), or by a majority of all members (Section 5033), the activities and affairs of a corporation shall be conducted and all corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the direction of the board. The board may delegate the management of the activities of the corporation to any person or persons, management company, or committee however composed, provided that the activities and affairs of the corporation shall be managed and all corporate powers shall be exercised under the ultimate direction of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7211.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in the articles or in the bylaws, all of the following apply:

(1) Meetings of the board may be called by the chair of the board or the president or any vice president or the secretary or any two directors.

(2) Regular meetings of the board may be held without notice if the time and place of the meetings are fixed by the bylaws or the board. Special meetings of the board shall be held upon four days’ notice by first-class mail or 48 hours’ notice delivered personally or by telephone, including a voice messaging system or by electronic transmission by the corporation (Section 20). The articles or bylaws may not dispense with notice of a special meeting. A notice, or waiver of
 notice, need not specify the purpose of any regular or special meeting of the board.

(3) Notice of a meeting need not be given to a director who provided a waiver of notice or consent to holding the meeting or an approval of the minutes thereof in writing, whether before or after the meeting, or who attends the meeting without protesting, prior thereto or at its commencement, the lack of notice to that director. These waivers, consents and approvals shall be filed with the corporate records or made a part of the minutes of the meetings.

(4) A majority of the directors present, whether or not a quorum is present, may adjourn any meeting to another time and place. If the meeting is adjourned for more than 24 hours, notice of an adjournment to another time or place shall be given prior to the time of the adjourned meeting to the directors who were not present at the time of the
 adjournment.

(5) Meetings of the board may be held at a place within or without the state that has been designated in the notice of the meeting or, if not stated in the notice or if there is no notice, designated in the bylaws or by resolution of the board.

(6) Directors may participate in a meeting through use of conference telephone, electronic video screen communication, or electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21). Participation in a meeting through use of conference telephone or electronic video screen communication pursuant to this subdivision constitutes presence in person at that meeting as long as all directors participating in the meeting are able to hear one another. Participation in a meeting through use of electronic transmission by and to the corporation, other than conference telephone and electronic video screen communication, pursuant
 to this subdivision constitutes presence in person at that meeting if both of the following apply:

(A) Each director participating in the meeting can communicate with all of the other directors concurrently.

(B) Each director is provided the means of participating in all matters before the board, including, without limitation, the capacity to propose, or to interpose an objection to, a specific action to be taken by the corporation.

(7) A majority of the number of directors authorized in or pursuant to the articles or bylaws constitutes a quorum of the board for the transaction of business. The articles or bylaws may require the presence of one or more specified directors in order to constitute a quorum of the board to transact business, as long as the death or nonexistence of a specified director or the death or
 nonexistence of the person or persons otherwise authorized to appoint or designate that director does not prevent the corporation from transacting business in the normal course of events. The articles or bylaws may not provide that a quorum shall be less than one-fifth the number of directors authorized in or pursuant to the articles or bylaws, or less than two, whichever is larger, unless the number of directors authorized in or pursuant to the articles or bylaws is one, in which case one director constitutes a quorum.

(8) Subject to the provisions of Sections 7212, 7233, 7234, and subdivision (e) of Section 7237 and Section 5233, insofar as it is made applicable pursuant to Section 7238, an act or decision done or made by a majority of the directors present at a meeting duly held at which a quorum is present is the act of the board. The articles or bylaws may not provide that a lesser vote than a majority of the directors present at a meeting
 is the act of the board. A meeting at which a quorum is initially present may continue to transact business notwithstanding the withdrawal of directors, if any action taken is approved by at least a majority of the required quorum for that meeting, or a greater number required by this division, the articles or the bylaws.

(b) An action required or permitted to be taken by the board may be taken without a meeting if all directors individually or collectively consent in writing to that action and if, subject to subdivision (a) of Section 7224, the number of directors then in office constitutes a quorum. The written consent or consents shall be filed with the minutes of the proceedings of the board. The action by written consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote of the directors. For purposes of this subdivision only, “all directors” does not include an “interested director” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5233,
 insofar as it is made applicable pursuant to Section 7238 or described in subdivision (a) of Section 7233, or a “common director” as described in subdivision (b) of Section 7233 who abstains in writing from providing consent, where (1) the facts described in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 5233 are established or the provisions of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7233 or in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7233 are satisfied, as appropriate, at or prior to execution of the written consent or consents; (2) the establishment of those facts or satisfaction of those provisions, as applicable, is included in the written consent or consents executed by the noninterested directors or noncommon directors or in other records of the corporation; and (3) the noninterested directors or noncommon directors, as applicable, approve the action by a vote that is sufficient without counting the votes of the interested directors or common directors.

(c) Each director shall have one vote on each matter presented to the board of directors for action. A director shall not vote by proxy.

(d) This section applies also to incorporators, to committees of the board, and to action by those incorporators or committees mutatis mutandis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 38.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7212.

(a) The board may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the number of directors then in office, provided that a quorum is present, create one or more committees, each consisting of two or more directors, to serve at the pleasure of the board. Appointments to such committees shall be by a majority vote of the directors then in office, unless the articles or bylaws require a majority vote of the number of directors authorized in or pursuant to the articles or bylaws. The bylaws may authorize one or more such committees, each consisting of two or more directors, and may provide that a specified officer or officers who are also directors of the corporation shall be a member or members of such committee or committees. The board may appoint one or more directors as alternate members of such
 committee, who may replace any absent member at any meeting of the committee. Such committee, to the extent provided in the resolution of the board or in the bylaws, shall have all the authority of the board, except with respect to:

(1) The approval of any action for which this part also requires approval of the members (Section 5034) or approval of a majority of all members (Section 5033), regardless of whether the corporation has members.

(2) The filling of vacancies on the board or in any committee which has the authority of the board.

(3) The fixing of compensation of the directors for serving on the board or on any committee.

(4) The amendment or repeal of bylaws or the adoption of new bylaws.

(5) The amendment or repeal of any resolution of the board which by its express terms is not so amendable or repealable.

(6) The appointment of committees of the board or the members thereof.

(7) The expenditure of corporate funds to support a nominee for director after there are more people nominated for director than can be elected.

(8) With respect to any assets held in charitable trust, the approval of any self-dealing transaction except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 5233.

(b) A committee exercising the authority of the board shall not include as members persons who are not directors. However, the board may create other committees that do not exercise the authority of the board and these other committees may
 include persons regardless of whether they are directors.

(c) Unless the bylaws otherwise provide, the board may delegate to any committee, appointed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 7151 or otherwise, powers as authorized by Section 7210, but may not delegate the powers set forth in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 15.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7213.

(a) A corporation shall have (1) a chair of the board, who may be given the title chair, chairperson, chair of the board, or chairperson of the board, or a president or both, (2) a secretary, (3) a treasurer or a chief financial officer or both, and (4) any other officers with any titles and duties as shall be stated in the bylaws or determined by the board and as may be necessary to enable it to sign instruments. The president, or if there is no president the chair of the board, is the general manager and chief executive officer of the corporation, unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws. Unless otherwise specified in the articles or the bylaws, if there is no chief financial officer, the treasurer is the chief financial officer of
 the corporation. Any number of offices may be held by the same person unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise. Where a corporation holds assets in charitable trust, any compensation of the president or chief executive officer and the chief financial officer or treasurer shall be determined in accordance with subdivision (g) of Section 12586 of the Government Code, if applicable.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws, officers shall be chosen by the board and serve at the pleasure of the board, subject to the rights, if any, of an officer under any contract of employment. Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the corporation without prejudice to the rights, if any, of the corporation under any contract to which the officer is a party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 57.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7214.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 7141 and Section 7142, any note, mortgage, evidence of indebtedness, contract, conveyance or other instrument in writing, and any assignment or endorsement thereof, executed or entered into between any corporation and any other person, when signed by any one of the chairperson of the board, the president or any vice president and by any one of the secretary, any assistant secretary, the chief financial officer, or any assistant treasurer of such corporation, is not invalidated as to the corporation by any lack of authority of the signing officers in the absence of actual knowledge on the part of the other person that the signing officers had no authority to execute the
 same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 58.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7215.

The original or a copy in writing or in any other form capable of being converted into clearly legible tangible form of the bylaws or of the minutes of any incorporators’, members’, directors’, committee or other meeting or of any resolution adopted by the board or a committee thereof, or members, certified to be a true copy by a person purporting to be the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, is prima facie evidence of the adoption of such bylaws or resolution or of the due holding of such meeting and of the matters stated therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Selection, Removal and Resignation of Directors [7220. - 7225.]

7220.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), (e), or (f), directors shall be elected for terms of not longer than four years, as fixed in the articles or bylaws. However, the terms of directors of a corporation without members may be up to six years. In the absence of any provision in the articles or bylaws, the term shall be one year. The articles or bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into groups of one or more directors. The terms of office of the several groups and the number of directors in each group need not be uniform. No amendment of the articles or bylaws may extend the term of a director beyond that for which the director was elected, nor may any bylaw provision increasing